Utah statutes.
55-5a-6.   Violations -- Misdemeanor.

(1)  The willful violation of this chapter by any officer, employee or agent of any political subdivision of this state, while acting in that capacity, is a class B misdemeanor.

(2)  The violation of Section 55-5a-3 is a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 241, 1991 General Session

